Alabama, session 2026rs, SB181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 12-5-11, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§12-5-11
In connection with the continuing judicial education of
justices, judges, and court-supportive personnel, the
Administrative Office of Courts and the Administrative
Director of Courts is authorized to may:
(1) directDirect the expenditure of funds appropriated
to the account of the National College of State Trial Judges
or any college of judges by whatever name the account appears,
or to any accounts or judicial education for the judicial
education of any justice, judge, or court-supportive
personnel;
Page 2

personnel;
SB181 INTRODUCED
(2) and may direct Direct that the actual and
reasonable expenses incurred by a justice, judge, or
court-supportive personnel attending the National College of
State Judiciary or any other college, institute, conference,
seminar , or organization be paid;.
(3)a. Create and use a nonprofit entity as defined by
26 U.S.C § 501(c)(3) to develop, implement, manage, and fund
judicial educational plans, conferences, and programs. The
entity may collect nonpublic funds to support this purpose.
b. An entity created under paragraph a. may hold
nonpublic funds in an account or accounts maintained outside
of the State Treasury, provided the account or accounts are
audited or reviewed annually by a certified, independent
accounting entity;
(4) Transfer state funds to the nonprofit to support
judicial education purposes; and
(5) House the entity created under paragraph (3)a. at
the Administrative Office of Courts and staff the entity with
employees of the Administrative Office of Courts."
Section 2. The provisions of this act are remedial and
curative and any actions taken by the Administrative Office of
Courts in conformance with this act are ratified and
confirmed.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on May 1,
2026.
Page 3